Wisconsin, session 2025, SB793.
do enact as follows:SB793,11Section 1. Agreement ratified. The legislature ratifies the tentative 2agreement negotiated for the 2025-26 fiscal year between the State of Wisconsin, 3the division of personnel management in the department of administration, and the 4Wisconsin State Building Trades Negotiating Committee, covering employees in the 5building trades crafts collective bargaining unit under subch. V of ch. 111, as 6approved by the employees of the building trades crafts collective bargaining unit 7and approved and recommended by the joint committee on employment relations, 8and authorizes the necessary expenditure of moneys for implementation from the 9appropriations made by s. 20.865 (1), subject to s. 20.865 (intro.). The 10administrator of the division of personnel management in the department of 11administration shall file an official copy of the agreement, certified by the 12cochairpersons of the joint committee on employment relations, with the secretary 13of state. No formal or informal agreement between the parties that is not a part of 14the official copy is deemed to be approved by the legislature under this act.SB793,215Section 2. Effective date.SB793,2,1916(1) This act takes effect on the day after publication, except that those 17provisions specifically identified as having other effective dates in the agreement 18covering employees in the building trades crafts collective bargaining unit are 19effective on the dates provided in that agreement.SB793,2,2020